Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0846.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (b) "Eligible costs" means the costs of a qualified examination. (c) "Licensed social worker" means a licensed bachelor's social worker or a licensed master's social worker as those terms are defined in section 18501 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18501 (d) "Qualified examination" means an examination that is approved and adopted by the Michigan board of social work created under section 18505 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18505. (e) "Qualified individual" means an individual who is seeking to become a licensed bachelor's social worker or a licensed master's social worker as those terms are defined in section 18501 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.18501, and who meets the requirements to become a licensed social worker except that the individual failed the qualified examination on the individual's first attempt. Sec. 3. The social worker scholarship program is created, to be administered by the department. The department shall do all of the following in implementing the scholarship program: (a) Award scholarships to eligible individuals under this act. (b) Promulgate rules necessary to implement this act pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (c) Publicize the availability of the social worker scholarship program, in partnership with universities, nonprofit organizations, and other persons. Sec. 5. (1) The department may award a scholarship for eligible costs under this act to a qualified individual determined by the department to meet all of the following eligibility criteria: (a) Has not been awarded a scholarship under this act at the time the individual submits an application. (b) Completes a signed application stating an intent to become a licensed social worker in this state and provides proof of residency in this state. (c) Will serve as a licensed social worker in a health professional shortage area as that term is defined in 42 USC 254e, or with a medically underserved population as that term is defined in 42 USC 254b. (d) Meets any other standards established in the rules promulgated by the department under section 3. (2) An individual may apply for a scholarship under this act by completing an application on a form provided by the department. Sec. 7. (1) A qualified individual must not receive more than $1,000.00 for an award under this act and must not receive more than 1 award under this act. (2) Not more than 6 months after receiving a scholarship under this act, the qualified individual shall be working toward passing a qualified examination and, subject to subsection (3), shall provide the department with documentation demonstrating that the qualified individual is working toward passing a qualified examination. The department shall accept any of the following as documentation required under this subsection: (a) A receipt or other documentation demonstrating that the qualified individual registered for a qualified examination. (b) A receipt or other documentation demonstrating that the qualified individual has paid for or registered for examination preparation materials or study courses. (c) A receipt or other documentation demonstrating other costs associated with the qualified individual completing the qualified examination, including, but not limited to, transportation or child care costs. (d) Any other documentation the department determines is sufficient to demonstrate the requirements of this subsection. (3) If an individual does not comply with subsection (2), the department shall seek repayment of the award unless the department grants an extension of time to a qualified individual for demonstrating to the department that the qualified individual had an illness or a family emergency, or there is a lack of availability of sites offering a qualified examination. Sec. 9. (1) The social worker scholarship fund is created within the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit in the social worker scholarship fund. The state treasurer shall direct investment of the social worker scholarship fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the social worker scholarship fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (3) Money in the social worker scholarship fund at the close of the fiscal year will remain in the fund and will not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the social worker scholarship fund for auditing purposes. (5) The department shall expend money from the social worker scholarship fund, upon appropriation, only for the purpose of providing scholarships under this act. Sec. 11. Subject to this section, the department shall publish an annual report that includes the number of qualified individuals who receive a scholarship under this act, the demographic information of those qualified individuals, and the qualified examination passage rates for those qualified individuals. The report under this section must not contain personal identifying information. The department shall provide the legislature with the report prepared under this section.